Georgia, session 2025_26, HB890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-8-3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to exemptions from
sales and use taxes, is amended by revising paragraph (101) as follows:
"(101)(A) The sale or use of noncommercial written materials or mailings by an
organization which is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code, if the organization is located in this state and provides such materials
to charity supporters for educational, charitable, religious, or fundraising purposes, to
the extent provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.
(B) This exemption shall apply from July 1, 2018, until July 1, 2026 2031. A
qualifying organization must shall pay sales and use tax on all purchases and uses of
H. B. 890
- 1 -

LC 50 1267
tangible personal property and may obtain the benefit of this exemption from sales and
use taxes by filing a claim for refund of tax paid on qualifying items. All No refunds
made pursuant to this paragraph shall not include interest;"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 890
- 2 -